Maryland, session 2025, SB0350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–130.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP
AND OFFER A CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSE ON STUDENT
WELL–BEING AND FLOURISHING.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE:
(I) TO ALL SCHOOL PERSONNEL AND ADMINISTRATORS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0350*

SENATE BILL 350
(II) THROUGH ASYNCHRONOUS INSTRUCTION.
(B) THE COURSE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE OFFERED AT A
COMPARABLE RATE TO CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT COURSES FOR
LICENSED PERSONNEL THAT CONTAIN THE SAME NUMBER OF PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT POINTS.
(C) (1) THE COURSE DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL CONSIST OF INSTRUCTION ON UNDERSTANDING THE EIGHT
DIMENSIONS OF WELL–BEING IDENTIFIED BY THE FEDERAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ADMINISTRATION AND APPLYING THOSE LESSONS TO
INCREASING STUDENT WELL–BEING THROUGH PEDAGOGY.
(2) THE COURSE SHALL INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON:
(I) SOCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
DIFFERENT TYPES OF RELATIONSHIPS FOR A STUDENT, AND A PEDAGOGICAL
APPROACH THAT HELPS STUDENTS BUILD FRIENDSHIPS AND A SENSE OF
BELONGING AND COMMUNITY IN THE CLASSROOM;
(II) ENVIRONMENTAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING:
1. THE IMPORTANCE OF A STUDENT’S CONNECTION TO
NATURE AND THE OUTDOORS, AND TEACHING THAT SUPPORTS LEARNING
OUTDOORS; AND
2. THE IMPORTANCE OF A STUDENT FEELING SAFE TO
THE STUDENT’S OVERALL WELL–BEING, AND A PEDAGOGY THAT SUPPORTS THAT
FEELING;
(III) PHYSICAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF A
HEALTHY BODY TO A STUDENT’S OVERALL WELL–BEING, AND A PEDAGOGY THAT
ENHANCES GOOD PHYSICAL HEALTH HABITS;
(IV) EMOTIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE
OF A STUDENT’S ABILITY TO EXPRESS FEELINGS, ADJUST TO EMOTIONAL
CHALLENGES, COPE WITH LIFE’S STRESSORS, AND ENJOY LIFE, AND A PEDAGOGY
THAT SUPPORTS THESE SKILLS, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF CONTEMPLATIVE
SCIENCE;
(V) SPIRITUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
A STUDENT’S SENSE OF MEANING, PURPOSE, AND CHARACTER, AND A PEDAGOGY
FOCUSED ON ENHANCING THOSE SENSES;

SENATE BILL 350 3
(VI) OCCUPATIONAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF WORK TO A STUDENT’S WELL–BEING, AND A PEDAGOGY THAT
ENHANCES A STUDENT’S UNDERSTANDING OF A PROFESSIONAL LIFE;
(VII) INTELLECTUAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE
IMPORTANCE OF A STUDENT’S ABILITY TO KEEP AN ACTIVE BRAIN, CULTIVATE
PERSONAL INTERESTS, AND PURSUE LIFELONG LEARNING, AND A PEDAGOGY THAT
ENHANCES A STUDENT’S UNDERSTANDING AND DEVELOPMENT OF A WHOLE SELF;
AND
(VIII) FINANCIAL WELL–BEING, INCLUDING THE IMPORTANCE OF
A STUDENT’S UNDERSTANDING OF FINANCIAL PROCESSES AND FINANCIAL
RESOURCES, AND A PEDAGOGY THAT SUPPORTS THAT UNDERSTANDING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.